Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3,127
Fine or penalty; collected by department; deposited in permanent school fund.

All money collected by the Department of Insurance as a fine or penalty shall be paid to the State Treasurer who shall deposit such money in the permanent school fund.

Laws 1979, LB 196, § 2.